Utah statutes.
62A-15-1002.   Declaration for mental health treatment.
(1)  An adult who is not incapable may make a declaration of preferences or
instructions regarding his mental health treatment.  The declaration may
include, but is not limited to, consent to or refusal of specified mental
health treatment.
(2)  A declaration for mental health treatment shall designate a capable adult
to act as attorney-in-fact to make decisions about mental health treatment for
the declarant.  An alternative attorney-in-fact may also be designated to act
as attorney-in-fact if the original designee is unable or unwilling to act at
any time.  An attorney-in-fact who has accepted the appointment in writing may
make decisions about mental health treatment on behalf of the declarant only
when the declarant is incapable.  The decisions shall be consistent with any
instructions or desires the declarant has expressed in the declaration.
(3)  A declaration is effective only if it is signed by the declarant and two
capable adult witnesses.  The witnesses shall attest that the declarant is
known to them, signed the declaration in their presence, appears to be of
sound mind and is not under duress, fraud, or undue influence.  Persons
specified in Subsection 62A-15-1003(6) may not act as witnesses.
(4)  A declaration becomes operative when it is delivered to the declarant's
physician or other mental health treatment provider and remains valid until it
expires or is revoked by the declarant.  The physician or provider is
authorized to act in accordance with an operative declaration when the
declarant has been found to be incapable.  The physician or provider shall
continue to obtain the declarant's informed consent to all mental health
treatment decisions if the declarant is capable of providing informed consent
or refusal.
(5) (a)  An attorney-in-fact does not have authority to make mental health
treatment decisions unless the declarant is incapable.
(b)  An attorney-in-fact is not, solely as a result of acting in that
capacity, personally liable for the cost of treatment provided to the
declarant.
(c)  Except to the extent that a right is limited by a declaration or by any
federal law, an attorney-in-fact has the same right as the declarant to
receive information regarding the proposed mental health treatment and to
receive, review, and consent to disclosure of medical records relating to that
treatment.  This right of access does not waive any evidentiary privilege.
(d)  In exercising authority under the declaration, the attorney-in-fact shall
act consistently with the instructions and desires of the declarant, as
expressed in the declaration.  If the declarant's desires are unknown, the
attorney-in-fact shall act in what he, in good faith, believes to be the best
interest of the declarant.
(e)  An attorney-in-fact is not subject to criminal prosecution, civil
liability, or professional disciplinary action for any action taken in good
faith pursuant to a declaration for mental health treatment.
(6) (a)  A declaration for mental health treatment remains effective for a
period of three years or until revoked by the declarant.  If a declaration for
mental health treatment has been invoked and is in effect at the expiration of
three years after its execution, the declaration remains effective until the
declarant is no longer incapable.
(b)  The authority of a named attorney-in-fact and any alternative attorney-
in-fact continues in effect as long as the declaration appointing the
attorney-in-fact is in effect or until the attorney-in-fact has withdrawn.
(7)  A person may not be required to execute or to refrain from executing a
declaration as a criterion for insurance, as a condition for receiving mental
or physical health services, or as a condition of discharge from a facility.
